Florida, session 2026, SB1446.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (n) is added to subsection (2) of 14 section 934.03, Florida Statutes, to read: 15 934.03âInterception and disclosure of wire, oral, or 16 electronic communications prohibited.â 17 (2) 18 (n)âIt is lawful under this section and ss. 934.04-934.09 19 for a person to intercept and record an oral communication if 20 the person is a party to the communication and the person has 21 reasonable grounds to believe that the recording will capture 22 evidence of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28. A 23 recording authorized under this paragraph may be provided to a 24 law enforcement agency, an attorney, or a court for the purpose 25 of evidencing an act of domestic violence. Such recording may 26 not be otherwise disseminated or shared. 27 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.